test/src/morphology/N-taeuesj20_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - täüsʼ: # Noun (20) täüsʼ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     täüsʼ+N+Sg+Nom: täüsʼ
     täüsʼ+N+Sg+Gen: tävve
     täüsʼ+N+Sg+Par: täüt
     täüsʼ+N+Sg+Ill: täüde
     täüsʼ+N+Pl+Gen: [täüsi, täüte]
     täüsʼ+N+Pl+Par: täüsi
     täüsʼ+N+Pl+Ill: [täüsihe, täüsi]
     täüsʼ+N+Pl+All: [tävvile, täütele]
